Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 11. Termination of Guardianships and Conservatorships

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 C.J.S. Guardian and Ward §§ 36 to 54.

§ 3-3-1101.
Cause for termination.

A guardianship shall cease, and a conservatorship shall terminate, upon the occurrence of any of the following circumstances:

If upon attaining the age of majority when the ward is a minor who has not been adjudged an incompetent person or a mentally incompetent person;

The death of the ward, subject to W.S. 3-2-109(a)(iii) and 3-2-201(a)(x);

A determination by the court that the ward is competent and capable of managing his property and affairs, and that the continuance of the guardianship or conservatorship is not in his best interest;

A determination by the court that the guardian or conservator is not acting in the best interest of the ward. In such case, the court shall appoint another guardian or conservator;

Upon determination by the court that the conservatorship or guardianship is no longer necessary for any other reason.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Distinction made between guardian of minor's estate and of his person. —

The Wyoming statutes make a distinction between a guardian of the estate of a minor child and the guardian of the child's person. In re Estate & Guardianship of Sowerwine, 413 P.2d 48,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1966).

When care and custody of minor are awarded to one parent in divorce action,

it means that parent is made the sole guardian of the “person” of the child. In re Estate & Guardianship of Sowerwine, 413 P.2d 48,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1966).

Termination was proper where undue influence was shown. —

Under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 3-3-1101(a)(iv), a trial court had the authority to remove a testator's stepdaughter as the testator's guardian after finding that she exercised undue influence over the testator; once her expenditures came to light in the context of the undue influence trial, the court properly considered them and relied upon them in removing her as guardian.
Kelly v. McNeel, 2011 WY 79, 250 P.3d 1105,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2010).

Stated in

KC v. CC (In re LNP), 2013 WY 20,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Feb 20, 2013).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Resignation or removal of executor, administrator, guardian, or trustee, before final administration or before termination of trust, as affecting his compensation, 96 ALR3d 1102.

§ 3-3-1102.
Assets exhausted.

When the assets of the estate of the ward do not exceed the amount of charges and claims against them, the court may direct the conservator to proceed to terminate the conservatorship.

When the assets of a minor ward are exhausted or consist of only personal property of an aggregate value not in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), the court, upon application or upon its own motion, may terminate the conservatorship and direct the conservator to deliver the property to the parent or other person having custody of a minor ward for the use of the ward after payment of allowed claims and expenses of administration. Delivery of the property has the same force and effect as if delivery had been made to the ward after he attains majority.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-1103.
Accounting to ward; notice of hearing.

Upon termination of a conservatorship, the conservator shall pay the costs of administration and render a full and complete accounting to the ward or his personal representative and to the court. Notice of hearing on the final report of a conservator shall be served on the ward or his personal representative unless notice is waived. Notice shall be served at the time and in the manner prescribed by the court.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

Quoted

in

Sands v. Brown (In re Sands), 2013 WY 60,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(May 15, 2013).

§ 3-3-1104.
Delivery of assets.

Upon termination of a conservatorship, all assets of the ward shall be delivered, under direction of the court, to the person or persons entitled thereto.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-1105.
Petition to terminate.

At any time, not less than six (6) months after the appointment of a guardian or conservator, the ward may petition the court alleging that he is no longer a proper subject of the guardianship or conservatorship and asking that the guardianship or conservatorship be terminated.

If any petition for termination of guardianship or conservatorship is denied, no other petition for termination may be filed until six (6) months have elapsed since the denial of the former petition.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-1106.
Discharge of conservator and release of bond.

Upon settlement of the final accounting of a conservator and upon determination that the property of the ward has been delivered to the person or persons lawfully entitled thereto, the court shall discharge the conservator and discharge the surety on the bond of the conservator.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-1107.
Termination of guardianships; reintegration plan.

Upon the filing of a petition for termination of guardianship by a parent, the court shall consider the best interests of the child while giving deference to the rebuttable presumption that a fit parent is entitled to custody of their child.

If the parent was found unfit at the time the guardianship was ordered, upon the parent’s successful petition for the termination of guardianship the court may create a reintegration plan to impose any necessary requirements to facilitate the child’s return to the parent including:

Establishing a graduated visitation schedule for the parent;

Requiring the parent to attend a parenting class or other appropriate education or treatment designed to address the problems that contributed to the necessity for a guardianship and to pay all or part of the cost of the class, education or treatment in accordance with the parent’s ability to pay;

Any other provision the court deems necessary.

History.

2019 ch. 130, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 130 § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 130 § 2, provides: "This act shall apply to petitions to terminate guardianships filed on or after July 1, 2019."